Missouri, session 2026, HB2656.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 640.870, to read as follows:
640.870. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Clean Skies
Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Aircraft", any device now known or hereafter invented, used, or designed
for navigation of or flight through the air;
(2) "Airport", an area on land or water that is used or intended to be used for
the landing and takeoff of aircraft including buildings, equipment, facilities, rights-of-
way, property, and appurtenant areas;
(3) "Cloud seeding", a type of weather engineering or experimentation that
involves the release of chemicals, chemical compounds, and pollutants into the
atmosphere that serve as cloud condensation or ice nuclei, which alter the
microphysical process within the cloud to change the amount or type of precipitation;
(4) "Department", the department of natural resources;
(5) "Geoengineering", the large-scale alteration or manipulation of the
environment including, but not limited to, the release of the following agents that
increase air pollutants which affect changes to the earth's atmosphere or surface:
(a) Aerosols, chemicals, chemical compounds;
(b) Any physical or biological agents;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2656 & 2388 2
(c) Solar radiation modification;
(d) Solar radiation reflection methods;
(e) Climate intervention; or
(f) Stratospheric aerosol injection;
(6) "Person", the same meaning as used in section 1.020;
(7) "Pollutant", includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) An aerosol, biologic, trans-biologic, genetically modified agent, chaff, metal,
radioactive material, acid, alkali, chemical, chemical compound, contaminant,
microelectronic mechanical system, smart dust, smoke, soot, substance, fume, vapor,
or air pollutant regulated by this state;
(b) A mechanical vibration, physical agent, particulate, or waste, including
materials that may be recycled, reconditioned, or reclaimed;
(c) A solid, liquid, gaseous, or thermal irritant; and
(d) An artificially produced electric field, magnetic field, electromagnetic field,
electromagnetic pulse, sound wave, sound pollution, light pollution, microwave, or
ionizing or nonionizing radiation;
(8) "Release", any activity that results in the issuance of contaminants such as
the emitting, transmitting, discharging, or injecting of one or more nuclear, biological,
trans-biological, chemical, or physical agents, into the ambient atmosphere, whether
once, intermittently, or continuously;
(9) "Serious physical injury", a physical injury that creates a substantial risk of
death or that causes serious disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any part of the body;
(10) "Weather modification", changing, controlling, or interfering with or
attempting to alter, change, control, or interfere with the natural development of cloud
forms, precipitation, barometric pressure, temperature, conductivity, or other
electromagnetic or sonic characteristics of the atmosphere.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person shall engage in any
form of geoengineering, weather modification, or cloud seeding in this state.
4. (1) The department shall create a publicly accessible online form for
reporting suspected violations under this section. The form shall contain a warning that
filing a false report with the department constitutes a class B misdemeanor as provided
under subdivision (5) of this subsection. The department shall establish procedures to
investigate credible reports to determine whether any violation has occurred.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, a credible report shall meet the following
requirements:
(a) a. The report is made by an airport employee or the owner of an aircraft.

HCS HBs 2656 & 2388 3
b. If the person filing the report is an airport employee, the report shall include
the airport’s three-letter code assigned by the International Air Transport Association,
and the person filing the report shall certify that the person is an employee of such
airport.
c. If the person filing the report is the owner of an aircraft, the report shall
include the aircraft’s registration number assigned by the Federal Aviation
Administration, and the person filing the report shall certify that the person is the
owner of such aircraft.
(b) The report explains the nature of the violation that has occurred and the
equipment on the aircraft which enabled a violation;
(c) The report includes the location of the aircraft which allows it to take flight;
and
(d) The report does not include images of the aircraft in flight appearing to
produce contrails.
(3) If the department determines that a violation of this section has occurred, the
department shall forward the results of the investigation to the county prosecutor of the
county in which such violation occurred or the Missouri attorney general's office for
potential prosecution.
(4) The department may enlist the assistance of local law enforcement, the
Missouri state highway patrol, or the Missouri National Guard to investigate and
enforce the provisions of this section as deemed necessary.
(5) Any person who makes a false report to the department that a violation of
this section has occurred shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
5. (1) Except as provided under subdivision (2) of this subsection, a person who
violates this section shall be guilty of:
(a) A class A misdemeanor for the first offense; and
(b) A class E felony for any second or subsequent offense.
(2) If serious physical injury or death results from a violation of this section, a
person shall be guilty of a class C felony.
6. Any person harmed by a violation of this section may commence a civil action
in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that a violation occurred, the
court may grant damages, including punitive damages, injunctive relief, attorney's fees,
and any such other relief the court finds appropriate.
7. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Actions taken for the purposes of farming and ranching operations in this
state unless such actions constitute cloud seeding; and
(2) Contrails from an aircraft.

HCS HBs 2656 & 2388 4
8. An owner of an aircraft or employee of an airport who is aware of an aircraft
equipped for cloud seeding, geoengineering, or weather modification and fails to make a
report to the department shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
9. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section including, but not limited to, listing the chemicals that are
considered to be a violation of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
100 shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
101 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
102 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
103 chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
104 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
105 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔